Wisconsin, session 2025, AB952.
do enact as follows:AB952,11Section 1. 941.29 (1g) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 224, is amended to read:AB952,2,123941.29 (1g) (a) “Violent felony” means any felony under s. 943.23 (1m), 1999 4stats., s. 943.23 (1r), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1g), 2021 stats., s. 940.19, 2023 stats., s. 5940.195, 2023 stats., s. 940.198, 2023 stats., s. 940.20, 2023 stats., s. 940.201, 2023 6stats., s. 940.203, 2023 stats., or s. 940.204, 2023 stats., this section sub. (1m), or s. 7940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.21, 940.225, 8940.23, 940.235, 940.285 (2), 940.29, 940.295 (3), 940.30, 940.302, 940.305, 940.31, 9940.43 (1) to (3), 940.45 (1) to (3), 940.60, 940.61, 940.62, 940.65, 940.66, 941.20, 10941.26, 941.28, 941.2905, 941.292, 941.30, 941.327 (2) (b) 3. or 4., 943.02, 943.04, 11943.06, 943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 943.32, 943.87, 946.43, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 12948.03, 948.04, 948.05, 948.051, 948.06, 948.07, 948.08, 948.085, or 948.30.AB952,213Section 2. 941.29 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB952,2,1814941.29 (3m) (a) A person who resides with a person who is prohibited under 15sub. (1m) from possessing a firearm shall, when not carrying the firearm, store any 16firearm he or she possesses in a securely locked box or container or in a locked 17location that a reasonable person would believe to be secure or ensure that a trigger 18lock is engaged on the firearm.AB952,2,1919(b) A person who violates par. (a) is guilty of the following:AB952,2,20201. For a first violation, a Class A misdemeanor.AB952,2,21212. For a 2nd or subsequent violation, a Class I felony.AB952,322Section 3. 973.123 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB952,3,91973.123 (1) In this section, “violent felony” means any felony under s. 943.23 2(1m), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1r), 1999 stats., or s. 943.23 (1g), 2021 stats., or s. 3940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.19, 940.195, 4940.198, 940.20, 940.201, 940.203, 940.204, 940.21, 940.225, 940.23, 940.235, 5940.285 (2), 940.29, 940.295 (3), 940.30, 940.302, 940.305, 940.31, 940.43 (1) to (3), 6940.45 (1) to (3), 941.20, 941.26, 941.28, 941.29 (1m), 941.292, 941.30, 941.327 (2) 7(b) 3. or 4., 943.02, 943.04, 943.06, 943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 943.32, 943.87, 946.43, 8948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03, 948.04, 948.05, 948.051, 948.06, 948.07, 948.08, 9948.085, or 948.30.AB952,3,1010